District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-440

Continuing partnership business — Liability of partners in certain cases; rights of creditors.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 646, Pub. L. 87-709, § 41
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-140.
1973 Ed., § 41-340.